Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1401.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1207.5. Educator Preparation Admission.--(a) A preparing institution OR AN ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM PROVIDER shall recruit and admit applicants who demonstrate potential for professional success in a public school by ensuring that each applicant admitted to an initial preparation program culminating in a bachelor's degree or higher shall have completed at least forty-eight (48) semester credit hours or the full-time equivalent of prior college or university coursework with a <--12345678910111213141516171819 minimum grade point average of 2.8. ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM PROVIDERS SHALL ENSURE THAT APPLICANTS HAVE COMPLETED A BACHELOR'S DEGREE WITH A MINIMUM GRADE POINT AVERAGE OF 2.8.(b) The criteria for admission to an advanced preparation program shall include at least the following:(1) An overall minimum grade point average of 2.8.(2) Faculty and professional recommendations.(3) A record of competence and effectiveness in professional work.(4) Graduation from a regionally accredited college or university.(c) A preparing institution may accept up to ten percent (10%) of the applicants for admission to the initial preparation program who do not meet overall minimum GPA requirements under subsection (a). The criteria for admission of applicants under this subsection shall be developed and documented by the preparing institution and must include the requirements in 22 Pa. Code § 49.12 (relating to eligibility).(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced preparation program." As defined in 22 Pa. Code § 354.1 (relating to definitions)."ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM PROVIDER." AS DEFINED IN 22 PA. CODE § 49.1 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS)."Applicant." As defined in 22 Pa. Code § 354.1."Initial preparation program." As defined in 22 Pa. Code § 354.1."Preparing institution." As defined in 22 Pa. Code § 354.1.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1401PN1683 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930